Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-653
Registration, defined.

Registration shall mean the registration certificate or certificates and license plates issued under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 149;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 237.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.